Utah statutes.
4-31-8.   Tuberculosis and Bangs Account created -- Exclusive use of
revenue.
There is created within the General Fund a restricted fund account known as
the "Tuberculosis and Bangs Disease Control Account." Revenue deposited in the
Tuberculosis and Bangs Disease Control Account shall be used exclusively by
the commissioner for the payment of expenses in administering tubercular tests
and Bangs disease tests and for the payment of indemnities for slaughtered
tubercular and Bang reacting dairy cattle.
